Missouri, session 2026, HB2927.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 537.058, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 537.058, to read as follows:
537.058. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Extracontractual damages", any amount of damage that exceeds the total
available limit of liability insurance for all of a liability insurer's liability insurance policies
applicable to a claim for personal injury, bodily injury, or wrongful death;
(2) "[Time-limited] Settlement demand", any offer to settle any claim for personal
injury, bodily injury, or wrongful death made by or on behalf of a claimant to a tort-feasor
with a liability insurance policy for purposes of settling a claim against such tort-feasor within
the insurer's limit of liability insurance[, which by its terms must be accepted within a
specified period of time];
(3) "Tort-feasor", any person claimed to have caused or contributed to cause personal
injury, bodily injury, or wrongful death to a claimant.
2. [A time-limited] In any lawsuit alleging extracontractual damages against the
tort-feasor's liability insurer, any prior settlement demand to settle any claim for personal
injury, bodily injury, or wrongful death shall [be] not be considered to have been a
reasonable opportunity to settle the claim unless the settlement demand was in writing,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2927 2
[shall reference] referenced this section, [shall be] was sent certified mail return-receipt
requested to the tort-feasor's liability insurer, remained open for acceptance by the liability
insurer for at least ninety days from the date such demand was received by the liability
insurer, and [shall contain] contained the following additional material terms:
(1) The time period within which the offer shall remain open for acceptance by the
tort-feasor's liability insurer[, which shall not be less] if the time period for acceptance is
more than ninety days from the date such demand is received by the liability insurer;
(2) The amount of monetary payment requested or a request for the applicable policy
limits;
(3) The date and location of the loss;
(4) The claim number, if known;
(5) A description of all known injuries sustained by the claimant;
(6) The party or parties to be released if such [time-limited] settlement demand is
accepted;
(7) A description of the claims to be released if such [time-limited] settlement
demand is accepted; and
(8) An offer of unconditional release for the liability insurer's insureds from all
present and future liability for that occurrence under section 537.060.
3. Such [time-limited] settlement demand shall be accompanied by:
(1) A list of the names and addresses of health care providers who provided treatment
to or evaluation of the claimant or decedent for injuries suffered from the date of injury until
the date of the [time-limited] settlement demand, and HIPAA compliant written
authorizations sufficient to allow the liability insurer to obtain such records from the
health care providers listed; and
(2) A list of the names and addresses of all the claimant's employers at the time the
claimant was first injured until the date of the [time-limited] settlement demand, and written
authorizations sufficient to allow the liability insurer to obtain such records from all
employers listed, if the claimant asserts a loss of wages, earnings, compensation, or profits
however denominated.
4. If a liability insurer with the right to settle on behalf of an insured receives a [time-
limited] settlement demand, such insurer may accept the [time-limited] settlement demand
by providing written acceptance of the material terms outlined in subsection 2 of this section,
delivered or postmarked to the claimant or the claimant's representative within the time period
[set in the time-limited] in which the settlement demand is open for acceptance by the
liability insurer, which in no event shall be less than ninety days.
5. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a claimant making a [time-limited] settlement
demand from requiring payment within a specified period; provided, however, that such

HB 2927 3
period for payment shall not be less than ten days after the insurer's receipt of a fully executed
unconditional release under section 537.060 as specified in subsection 2 of this section.
6. Nothing in this section applies to offers or demands or [time-limited] settlement
demands issued within ninety days of the trial by jury of any claim on which a lawsuit has
been filed.
7. In any lawsuit filed by a claimant as an assignee of the tort-feasor or by the tort-
feasor for the benefit of the claimant, a [time-limited] settlement demand that does not
comply with the terms of this section shall not be considered as a reasonable opportunity to
settle for the insurer and shall not be admissible in any lawsuit alleging extracontractual
damages against the tort-feasor's liability insurer.
✔